Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 2 Department of Human Services

Cross references.

Probation officers, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 2.4.

Sharing of court records among juvenile courts, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 3.9.

Commencement of juvenile court proceeding for child on aftercare to Division of Youth Services, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 4.6.

Time limitations upon other orders of disposition in juvenile court proceedings, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 15.3.

Court costs for care of child certified by juvenile court, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 21.1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015).